src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Selkup denote actions.

LEXICON Verbs
анталяли   v1 "to fight"    ;
вәрк       v1 "to stay?"    ;
анталты    v1 "to compete?" ;
апсты      v1 "to feed"     ;
ӄəнп       v1 "to go"       ;
илы        v1 "to live"     ;
ку         v1 "to die"      ;
ылалты     v1 "to win"      ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
